Alabama, session 2026rs, HB46.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
52 Section 1. Sections 26-23H-3 and 26-23H-4, Code of
53 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
54 "§26-23H-3
55 As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have
56 the following meanings:
Page 2

the following meanings:
HB46 INTRODUCED
57 (1) ABORTION. The use or prescription of any
58 instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance or device
59 with the intent to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to
60 be pregnant with knowledge that the termination by those means
61 will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the unborn
62 child. The term does not include these activities if done with
63 the intent to save the life or preserve the health of an
64 unborn child, remove a dead unborn child, to deliver the
65 unborn child prematurely to avoid a serious health risk to
66 preserve the health of the unborn child's mother, or to
67 preserve the health of her unborn child. The term does not
68 include a procedure or act to terminate the pregnancy of a
69 woman with an ectopic pregnancy, nor does it include the
70 procedure or act to terminate the pregnancy of a woman when
71 the unborn child has a lethal anomaly.
72 (2) ECTOPIC PREGNANCY. Any pregnancy resulting from
73 either a fertilized egg that has implanted or attached outside
74 the uterus or a fertilized egg implanted inside the cornu of
75 the uterus.
76 (3) LETHAL ANOMALY. A condition from which an unborn
77 child would die after birth or shortly thereafter or be
78 stillborn.
79 (4) MAN. A male human being, whether or not he has
80 reached the age of majority.
81 (5) MEDICAL EMERGENCY. A condition which, in reasonable
82 medical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of the
83 pregnant woman that her pregnancy must be terminated to avoid
84 a serious health risk as defined in this chapter preserve the
Page 3

a serious health risk as defined in this chapter preserve the
HB46 INTRODUCED
85 health of the unborn child's mother.
86 (5)(6) PHYSICIAN. A person licensed to practice
87 medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in
88 Alabama.
89 (6) SERIOUS HEALTH RISK TO THE UNBORN CHILD'S MOTHER.
90 In reasonable medical judgment, the child's mother has a
91 condition that so complicates her medical condition that it
92 necessitates the termination of her pregnancy to avert her
93 death or to avert serious risk of substantial physical
94 impairment of a major bodily function. This term does not
95 include a condition based on a claim that the woman is
96 suffering from an emotional condition or a mental illness
97 which will cause her to engage in conduct that intends to
98 result in her death or the death of her unborn child. However,
99 the condition may exist if a second physician who is licensed
100 in Alabama as a psychiatrist, with a minimum of three years of
101 clinical experience, examines the woman and documents that the
102 woman has a diagnosed serious mental illness and because of
103 it, there is reasonable medical judgment that she will engage
104 in conduct that could result in her death or the death of her
105 unborn child. If the mental health diagnosis and likelihood of
106 conduct is confirmed as provided in this chapter, and it is
107 determined that a termination of her pregnancy is medically
108 necessary to avoid the conduct, the termination may be
109 performed and shall be only performed by a physician licensed
110 in Alabama in a hospital as defined in the Alabama
111 Administrative Code and to which he or she has admitting
112 privileges.
Page 4

privileges.
HB46 INTRODUCED
113 (7) UNBORN CHILD, CHILD, OR PERSON. A human being,
114 specifically including an unborn child in utero at any stage
115 of development, regardless of viability.
116 (8) WOMAN. A female human being, whether or not she has
117 reached the age of majority."
118 "§26-23H-4
119 (a) It shall be unlawful for any person to
120 intentionally perform or attempt to perform an abortion except
121 as provided for by subsection (b) or (c).
122 (b) An abortion shall be permitted if an attending
123 physician licensed in Alabama determines that an abortion is
124 necessary in order to prevent a serious health risk to
125 preserve the health of the unborn child's mother. Except in
126 the case of a medical emergency as defined herein, the
127 physician's determination shall be confirmed in writing by a
128 second physician licensed in Alabama. The confirmation shall
129 occur within 180 days after the abortion is completed and
130 shall be prima facie evidence for a permitted abortion.
131 (c)(1) An abortion shall be permitted if the pregnancy
132 is the result of an act of rape or incest.
133 (2) If a man is convicted of the act of rape or incest
134 and the act results in pregnancy, the court shall require him
135 to: (i) pay for all medical expenses associated with the
136 resulting pregnancy and abortion; and (ii) undergo either a
137 vasectomy or castration."
138 Section 2. Section 26-23H-4.1 is added to the Code of
139 Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
140 §26-23H-4.1
Page 5

§26-23H-4.1
HB46 INTRODUCED
141 (a) If an abortion is necessary to preserve the health
142 of an unborn child's mother pursuant to Section 26-23H-4, the
143 mother of the unborn child may petition the circuit court to
144 require the unborn child's father to pay all medical expenses
145 associated with the pregnancy and the abortion including, but
146 not limited to, expenses associated with any complications
147 resulting from the pregnancy or abortion.
148 (b) A father required to pay for expenses pursuant to
149 subsection (a) may petition the circuit court for relief from
150 those requirements, provided that the father agrees to undergo
151 a vasectomy. A man required to undergo a vasectomy under this
152 subsection must provide the court with documentation of the
153 vasectomy.
154 (c) If a man required to pay for expenses pursuant to
155 subsection (a) disputes that he is the father of the unborn
156 child in question, he may petition the circuit court to
157 adjudicate paternity. If the court determines that the man is
158 the biological father of the unborn child, he must either pay
159 the expenses required by subsection (a) or petition for a
160 grant of relief pursuant to subsection (b).
161 (d)(1) The appropriate venue for an expected proceeding
162 under this section is the circuit court in the county in which
163 the unborn child's alleged father resides or in which the
164 unborn child's mother resides.
165 (2) Court proceedings under this section shall be given
166 precedence over other pending matters as necessary to ensure
167 that the court may reach a decision promptly, but in no case
168 shall the court fail to rule within 48 hours after the time
Page 6

shall the court fail to rule within 48 hours after the time
HB46 INTRODUCED
169 the petition is filed, Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays
170 excluded.
171 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
172 1, 2026.
Page 7